apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
LEXICON LONDONUCASE-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: R ;        
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a R ;   !            
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:av K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ij K ;    !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:in K ; !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:is K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj K ;    !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:an K ;	   !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:as K ;	   !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ijn K ; !
 +Ess+Use/Sub:in K ; !
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:a K ; !
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ij K ; !
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ij R ;      !        
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ijt K ; !
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ijda K ; !
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:ijn K ; !
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ijs K ; !
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:ij K ; !


!LEXICON NIILLAS-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> NIILLASDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON NIILLAS-org
! +N+Prop+Org:%> NIILLASDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON NIILLAS-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:%>  NIILLASDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON NIILLAS-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  NIILLASDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON NIILLAS-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> NIILLASDECL ;
 
!LEXICON NIILLAS-ani
! +N+Prop+Ani:%> NIILLASDECL ;
 
!LEXICON NIILLAS-plc ! Place names
! +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NIILLASDECL ;

!LEXICON NIILLAS ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop:%> NIILLASDECL ;

!LEXICON NIILLASDECL ! Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
! @U.Cap.Obl@ NIILLAS-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

!LEXICON NIILLAS-OBL
!# ;


!LEXICON ANAR-ani
! +N+Prop+Ani:%> ANARDECL ; 

LEXICON ANAR-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ANARDECL ;
 
LEXICON ANAR-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ANARDECL ;

!LEXICON ANAR
! +N+Prop:%> ANARDECL ;
 
LEXICON ANARDECL ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ; !

LEXICON ANAR-OBL
LONDONDECL ;
 
!LEXICON GUOLBBA-plc
! +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ GUOLBBA ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB
! +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:X3@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
!LEXICON GUOLBBA
! +Sg+Nom:X3 K ;
! +Ess:X3n K ;
! +Sg+Nom:X3 R ;        
! +Sg+Gen:X5a K ;
! +Sg+Gen:X5a R ;              
! +Sg+Acc:X5av K ;
! +Sg+Ill:X5ij K ;  
! +Sg+Ine:X5in K ;
! +Sg+Ela:X5is K ;
! +Sg+Com:X5ijn K ;
! +Ess:X5in K ;
! +Pl+Nom:X5a K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X5ij K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X5ij R ;             
! +Pl+Acc:X5ijt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:X5ijda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:X5ijn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:X5ijs K ;
! +Pl+Com:X5ij K ;


!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-sur
!# ;
!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-plc
!# ;

!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-ani
!# ;

!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-mal
!# ;


!LEXICON ROMSA-plc
! +N+Prop+Plc:%> ROMSADECL ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

!LEXICON ROMSADECL !Inanim. Contracted -Names - from SUOLU
! @U.Cap.Obl@ ROMSA-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB
! @U.Cap.Opt@ ROMSA-DC ;

!LEXICON ROMSA-DC
!# ;
!LEXICON ROMSA-OBL 
!# ;

!LEXICON RANES-plc !Ráneš:%>Rátnehii
! +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RANES-OBL ;
 
!LEXICON RANES-OBL
! +Sg+Nom:Q1š K ; !XXX Q1 does not work because when there is -tn-
! +CmpN/SgN:Q1š R ; !XXX Q1 does not work because when there is -tn-
! +Ess:Q1šin K ; !XXX Q1 does not work because when there is -tn-
! +Sg+Gen:ha K ;
! +Sg+Gen:ha R ; 
! +Sg+Acc:hav K ;
! +Sg+Ill:hij K ;
! +Sg+Ela:his K ;
! +Sg+Ine:hin K ;
! +Sg+Com:hijn K ;
! +Pl+Nom:ha K ;
! +Pl+Gen:hij K ;
! +Pl+Acc:hijt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:hijda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:hijn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:hijs K ;
! +Pl+Com:hij K ;

!LEXICON CAVKKUS-plc !Čavkkus:%>Čavkohii
! +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ CAVKKUS-OBL ;
 
!LEXICON CAVKKUS-OBL
! +Sg+Nom:us K ;
! +CmpN/SgN:us R ; 
! +Ess:usin K ;
! +Sg+Gen:oha K ;
! +Sg+Gen:oha R ; 
! +Sg+Acc:ohav K ;
! +Sg+Ill:ohij K ;
! +Sg+Ine:ohis K ;
! +Sg+Ela:ohin K ;
! +Sg+Com:ohijn K ;
! +Pl+Nom:oha K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ohij K ;
! +Pl+Acc:ohijt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:ohijda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:ohijn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:ohijs K ;
! +Pl+Com:ohij K ;




LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> DAVVISUOLUDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON DAVVISUOLUDECL !Inanim. Contracted -Names - from DAVVISUOLU
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DAVVISUOLU-OBL ;

LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-OBL 
 +Sg+Nom:Q3j K ;
 +Ess:Q3n K ;
 +CmpN/SgN:Q3j R ;        
 +Sg+Ill:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:X4n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X4s K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
 +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
 +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
 +Ess:n K ;
 
!LEXICON DUORTNUS-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS-sur
! +N+Prop+Plc:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS
! +N+Prop:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUSUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@ LASJ; !

LEXICON DUORTNUSUCASE ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
 :Q1 NE-ODDCASE ; ! Q1 is general WeG
 +Sg+Nom: R ;                 
 +Sg+Gen:X5a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X5a R ;              
 +Sg+Acc:X5av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X5ij K ;  
 +Sg+Ine:X5in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X5is K ;
 +Sg+Com:X5ijn K ;
 +Ess:X5in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X5a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij R ;             
 +Pl+Acc:X5ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:X5ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:X5ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5ij K ;


!LEXICON HEANDARAT-ani
! +N+Prop+Ani:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-org
! +N+Prop+Org:%> HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:%>  HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> HEANDARATDECL ;
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-plc ! Place names
! +N+Prop+Plc:%>  HEANDARATDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>aQ1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;



!LEXICON HEANDARAT ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop:%> HEANDARATDECL ;
 
!LEXICON HEANDARATDECL
! @U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARATUCASE ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

!LEXICON HEANDARATUCASE ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
! +Sg+Nom:a K ;
! +Sg+Nom:a R ;                        
! +Ess:an K ;
! +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
! +Sg+Gen:aQ1 K ;
! +Sg+Gen:aQ1 R ;      
! +Sg+Acc:aQ1v K ;
! +Sg+Ine:aQ1n K ;
! +Sg+Ela:aQ1s K ;
! +Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j R ;     
! +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
! +Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;
! +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K ;

!LEXICON BASUDIS-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> BASUDISDECL ; 
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> BASUDISDECL ; 
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  BASUDISDECL ; 
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  BASUDISDECL ; 
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BASUDISDECL ;
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  BASUDISDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>aQ1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;



!LEXICON BASUDIS ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop:%> BASUDISDECL ;
 
LEXICON BASUDISDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BASUDISUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ; !

LEXICON BASUDISUCASE ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: R ;                        
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 R ;      
 +Sg+Acc:aQ1v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:aQ1n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:aQ1s K ;
 +Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aQ1j R ;     
 +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
 +Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-org
! +N+Prop+Org:%> GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;
 
LEXICON GEAVNNIS-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Y7@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS
! +N+Prop:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNISUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ; !

LEXICON ProperNoun
Ádjagas:Ádjagass BASUDIS-org ;
Ájluhasj:Ájluhadtj BASUDIS-mal ;
Duorbun DUORTNUS-plc ;
 Eurohpá#Åvtåstus+Use/Sub:Eurohpá#Åvtåstuss BASUDIS-org ; !
 Goabddális:Goabddáliss BASUDIS-plc ; !village
 Listárjjus:Listárjjuss BASUDIS-sur ; !Laestadius!
 Listárjjus:Listárjjuss BASUDIS-sur ; !Laestadius!
 Oarjjelij-Bájdár:Oarjjelij-Bájddár9 DUORTNUS-plc ; !village
Total^teáhter ANAR-org ;
Nussir ANAR-org ;
Vuorká-Dávvir ANAR-org ;
Poastal ANAR-obj ;
Gárdin:Gárdim ANAR-obj ;
Divvun:Divvum ANAR-obj ;
Riffan:Riffan ANAR-mal ;
Lárin:Lárin ANAR-mal ;
Hegon:Hegon ANAR-mal ;
Iskkon:Iskkon ANAR-mal ;
Iŋgun:Iŋgun ANAR-mal ;
Gugán:Gugán ANAR-mal ;
Dávvet:Dávved ANAR-mal ;
Issat:Issag ANAR-mal ;
Asllat:Asllad9 ANAR-mal ;
Ville-Ásllat:Ville-Ásllad9 ANAR-mal ;
Kulttor-Ásllat:Kulttor-Ásllad9 ANAR-mal ;
Ásllat:Ásllad9 ANAR-mal ;
Ásllat:Ásllag ANAR-mal ;
Aslat:Aslad9 ANAR-mal ;
Áslat:Áslad9 ANAR-mal ;
Issat:Issad9 ANAR-mal ;
Olet:Oled9 ANAR-mal ;
Mel^let:Mel^led9 ANAR-mal ;
Jovsset:Jovssed9 ANAR-mal ;
Dávvet:Dávved9 ANAR-mal ;
Simit:Simid9 ANAR-mal ;
Nanit:Nanid9 ANAR-mal ;
Apmot:Apmod9 ANAR-mal ;
Ápmot:Ápmod9 ANAR-mal ;
Ánot:Ánod9 ANAR-mal ;
Issát:Issád9 ANAR-mal ;
Ásllat:Ásllak ANAR-mal ;
Áslat:Áslak ANAR-mal ;
Ammul ANAR-mal ;
Sámmul ANAR-mal ;
Mikkál ANAR-mal ;
El0lon:El'lon ANAR-mal ;
Irján ANAR-mal ;
Deahppán ANAR-mal ;
Jovsset:Jovssep ANAR-mal ;
Ánddir ANAR-mal ;
Iŋgor ANAR-mal ;
Guhtur ANAR-mal ;
Biehttár ANAR-mal ;
Ivvár ANAR-mal ;
Niilas:Niilas ANAR-mal ;
Niillas:Niillas ANAR-mal ;
Hánas ANAR-mal ;
Ándaras ANAR-mal ;
Ráipis ANAR-mal ;
Ráipás ANAR-mal ;
Simit-Risten:Simit-Risten ANAR-fem ;
Birgget:Birg'ed9 ANAR-fem ;
Birgget:Birgged9 ANAR-fem ;
Márgget:Márgged9 ANAR-fem ;
Márget:Márged9 ANAR-fem ;
Állet:Álled9 ANAR-fem ;
Álet:Áled9 ANAR-fem ;
Biret:Bired9 ANAR-fem ;
Máret:Máred9 ANAR-fem ;
Gutnel ANAR-fem ;
Iŋger ANAR-fem ;
Sárgon:Sárgon ANAR-sur ;
Nilut:Nilud9 ANAR-sur ;
Luhkkar ANAR-sur ;
Guhtor ANAR-sur ;
Guhttor ANAR-sur ;
Rugaš ANAR-sur ;
 Jovsset:Jovsseb ANAR-mal ; ! XXX 3?
 Niilut+Use/Sub:Niiluh ANAR-sur ; !
 Sáhppán^gillar+Use/Sub:Sáhppán^gillar ANAR-org; ! !Sáhppángillár gánddat
